Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8148.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 24-12 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Turnpike and
Bridge Authority" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
24-12-60. Safety barrier on bridges.
(a) The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority (RITBA) is hereby directed to design
a safety barrier and/or safety netting on the Mount Hope Bridge, the Claiborne Pell Bridge, the
Staff Sergeant Christopher Potts Sakonnet River Bridge, and the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge
(the “bridges”). The process shall be implemented as follows:
(1) RITBA shall submit the design of the safety barrier and/or safety netting for the bridges
to the house finance committee and the senate finance committee on or before January 1, 2027.
(2) RITBA shall issue a request for proposals for the safety barrier and/or safety netting on
or before April 30, 2027.
(3) Proposals shall be reviewed and accepted by RITBA, and construction and installation
of the safety barrier and/or safety netting shall commence on the bridges, no later than August 1,
2027.
(b) Any newly constructed bridges within the state with a deck height of over one hundred
feet (100′) shall be required to have safety barriers or safety netting.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003354
========
LC003354 - Page 2 of 3